Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 2 Agricultural Cooperative Associations
2-2-424. Agreements with other associations.

Upon resolution adopted by its board of directors, any association may enter into all necessary and proper contracts and agreements and make all necessary and proper stipulations, agreements, contracts, and arrangements with any other cooperative corporation or association formed in this or any other state for the cooperative and more economical carrying on of its business or any part thereof.

By agreement between them, any two (2) or more associations may unite in employing and using or may separately employ and use the same methods, means, and agencies for carrying on and conducting their respective businesses.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 116, § 22; Pope's Dig., § 2307; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-922.

2-2-425. Existing entities may participate.

(1)By a majority vote of its stockholders or members, any corporation or association organized under previous existing statutes may be brought under the provisions of this subchapter by limiting its membership and adopting the other restrictions as provided in this subchapter.

It shall make out in duplicate a statement signed and sworn to by its directors upon forms supplied by the Secretary of State to the effect that the corporation or association has by a majority vote of its stockholders or members decided to accept the benefits and be bound by the provisions of this subchapter.

The filing fee shall be the same as for filing an amendment to articles of incorporation.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 116, § 23; Pope's Dig., § 2308; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-923.

2-2-426. Arrangements not in restraint of trade.

No association organized under this subchapter shall be deemed to be a combination in restraint of trade or an illegal monopoly or an attempt to lessen competition or fix prices arbitrarily. The marketing contracts or agreements between the association and its members or any agreements authorized in this subchapter are not illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 116, § 25; Pope's Dig., § 2310; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-925.

2-2-427. Tax exemption.

Each association organized under this subchapter shall be exempt from all franchise or license taxes.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 116, § 28; 1937, No. 351, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 2313; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-927.

2-2-428. General corporation laws.

The provisions of the general corporation laws of this state and all powers and rights thereunder shall apply to the associations organized under this subchapter, except where the provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the express provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 116, § 27; Pope's Dig., § 2312; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-926.

Cross References. Business Corporation Act of 1987, §4-27-101 et seq.

2-2-429. Conflicting laws.

Any provisions of law which are in conflict with this subchapter shall not be construed as applying to the associations provided for in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 116, § 20; Pope's Dig., § 2305; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-920.

2-2-430. Conversion to nonprofit corporate status.

An association formed under this subchapter may elect to be governed by the provisions of the Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act of 1993, § 4-33-101 et seq., by amending and restating its articles of incorporation to provide that it shall be so governed.

The election shall be approved upon receiving the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast at any regular meeting, or at any special meeting called for that purpose, in which members holding not less than fifty percent (50%) of the voting power of the association are represented in person or by proxy, but the election once made shall be irrevocable.

The amended and restated articles of incorporation shall comply with and shall be filed under the provisions of the Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act of 1993, § 4-33-101 et seq., and thereafter the association shall be governed by the Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act of 1993, § 4-33-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1979, No. 1096, § 14: Apr. 19, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared that a record should be kept of the acquisition by foreign parties of Arkansas agricultural land since such acquisition may constitute an undesirable foreign influence upon the people of this state and the welfare of its people and may contribute to the deterioration of the family farm system and the rural community and may result in abuse to Arkansas farm land through improper conservation measures. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

DeSimone, Survey of Property Law, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 286.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 521, § 1.

2-2-413. Regular and special meetings.